Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1503.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1503.1. The following coin-operated vending devices
shall be exempt from the provisions of this article, Section 1501 et
seq. of this title:
1. All coin-operated vending devices owned by and located in a
public or private school, a church, or a governmental entity;
2. All coin-operated vending devices which dispense only
newspapers or periodicals;
3. All coin-operated vending devices which dispense only
postage stamps; and

Req. No. 11573 Page 1

4. All coin-operated vending devices installed on federal
military bases; and
5. All coin-operated devices manufactured prior to January 1,
2000, the price per play of which does not exceed fifty cents
($0.50) if the device is designed to provide entertainment in the
form of a game or music and which does not involve gambling. As
used in this paragraph, a device involves "gambling" if the outcome
produced by the device is based on pure chance without any physical
or intellectual skills or efforts being required of the game player
or participant.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11573 MAH 01/15/25











Req. No. 11573 Page 2